District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0725.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “School Health Certificate Modernization Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The Student Health Care Act of 1985, effective December 3, 1985 (D.C. Law 6-
66; D.C. Official Code § 38-601 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 38-602) is amended by adding new subsections (e)
and (f) to read as follows:
“(e) Health care providers shall not charge a parent or guardian a fee or surcharge for a
certificate of health, certificate of testing for lead poisoning, certificate of dental health ,or any
other health certificate required by the Mayor for a student to attend school.


“(f)(1) Before the start of School Year 2028-2029, the Department of Health
(“Department”) shall develop and implement a digital platform for health care providers to
submit certificates of health and certificates of dental health required by this section directly to
the Department.
“(2) The digital platform required by paragraph (1) of this subsection shall:
“(A) Allow a public or private school administrator to see which of the
school’s students has submitted the required forms; and
“(B) Not require the student’s parent or guardian to play an active role in
the transferring, downloading, emailing, or otherwise submission of the certificates; except, that,
the parent or guardian may be required to sign a consent form for their student’s health
information to be submitted through the portal.”.
Sec 3. Section 505 of the District of Columbia Health Occupations Revision Act of 1985,
effective March 25, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-99; D.C. Official Code § 3-1205.05), is amended as
follows:
(a) Subsection (a)(2) is amended by striking the phrase “fees established by the Mayor”
and inserting the phrase “fees established by the Mayor in accordance with subsection (a-1) of
this section” in its place.
(b) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
“(a-1) For all fees collected pursuant to subsection (a)(2) of this section, the Mayor shall
establish a tiered fee structure based on the educational requirements of each health professional.
Fees for licenses, registrations, or certifications shall range from lowest to highest for health
professions in the following order:
“(1) Does not require an undergraduate degree;


“(2) Requires an undergraduate degree;
“(3) Requires a masters level degree; and
“(4) Requires a doctoral degree.”.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 602(c)(3) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act,
approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; DC. . Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(3)).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the
District of Columbia Register.